Utah statutes.
41-6a-1639.   Hazardous materials -- Transportation regulations -- Fire
extinguishers.
(1) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, the Department of Transportation shall make rules for the safe
transportation of hazardous materials.
(b)  The rules shall adopt by reference or be consistent with current
Hazardous Materials Regulations of the United States Department of
Transportation.
(c)  An adoption by reference under Subsection (1)(b) shall be construed to
incorporate amendments thereto as may be made from time to time.
(2)  A person operating a vehicle transporting any hazardous material as a
cargo or part of a cargo on a highway shall at all times comply with rules
made by the Department of Transportation under this section including being:
(a)   marked or placarded; and
(b)  equipped with fire extinguishers:
(i)  of a type, size, and number approved by rule; and
(ii)  that are filled, ready for immediate use, and placed at a convenient
point on the vehicle.
